Washington statutes.
RCW 44.16.060

To whom directed—Interrogatories.

Every such commission shall be directed to such magistrate or other person, as the committee may designate, and interrogatories framed by the committee shall be annexed thereto.

[ 1895 c 6 s 5; RRS s 8182.]